Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
ARTICLE 18
COLORADO CONSUMER CREDIT REPORTING ACT

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2017. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

5-18-101. Short title.

The short title of this article 18 is the "Colorado Consumer Credit Reporting Act".

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1114, § 3, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-101 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that the use of consumer reporting agencies is increasing rapidly as consumer credit transactions become the rule rather than the exception in every-day consumer purchasing. Consumer credit reports by consumer reporting agencies may report on a consumer's credit worthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, debts, character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living as factors to establish a consumer's eligibility for credit insurance or employment. When a consumer reporting agency undertakes a business that has the potential to profoundly affect an individual consumer's life, whether for good or ill, it is incumbent upon such agencies to ensure that the information they are providing is accurate. Inaccurate consumer credit reports directly impair the efficiency of the banking system and unfair credit reporting methods undermine the public confidence in the banking system. There is a need to ensure that consumer reporting agencies exercise their responsibilities with fairness, impartiality, and respect for the consumer's rights. The general assembly further finds and declares that, in the event the information provided by a consumer reporting agency in a consumer credit report is inaccurate, the consumer has the right to have that information corrected in a swift and uncomplicated way.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1114, § 3, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-101.5 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 18, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Adverse action" includes:

The denial of, increase in any charge for, or reduction in the amount of insurance for personal, family, or household purposes;

The denial of employment or any other decision for employment purposes that adversely affects a current or prospective employee; and

An action or determination with respect to a consumer's application for credit under a credit arrangement that is adverse to the consumer's interests.

"Consumer" means a natural person residing in the state of Colorado.

"Consumer report" means any written, oral, or other communication or any information by a consumer reporting agency bearing on a consumer's credit worthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, debts, character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living, that is used or expected to be used or collected, in whole or in part, as a factor to establish a consumer's eligibility for credit or insurance to be used for personal, family, or household purposes, employment purposes, or any other purpose authorized pursuant to applicable provisions of the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act", 15 U.S.C. secs. 1681a and 1681b, as amended.

"Consumer report" does not include:

Any report containing information solely as to a transaction between the consumer and the person making the report;

Any authorization or approval of a specific extension of credit directly or indirectly by the issuer of a credit card or similar device;

Any report in which a person who has been requested by a third party to make a specific extension of credit directly or indirectly to a consumer conveys a decision with respect to the request, if the third party advises the consumer of the name and address of the person to whom the request was made and the person makes the disclosures that must be made to the consumer pursuant to the provisions of the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681m, as amended, in the event of adverse action.

"Consumer reporting agency" means any person that, for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer reports to third parties. "Consumer reporting agency" shall not include any business entity that provides check verification or check guarantee services only.

"Credit scoring" means the practice of quantifying the credit risk a person presents using the person's history, characteristics, or attributes in a formula designed to objectively rate credit risk or insurance risk of loss.

"Creditworthiness" means any entry in a consumer's credit file that impacts the ability of a consumer to obtain and retain credit, employment, business or professional licenses, investment opportunities, or insurance. Entries contained in a consumer file or in a consumer report that affect creditworthiness shall include, but not be limited to, payment information, defaults, judgments, liens, bankruptcies, collections, records of arrest and indictments, and multiple-credit inquiries.

"Dwelling" means a residential structure that contains one to four units, whether or not that structure is attached to real property. The term includes any individual condominium unit, cooperative unit, mobile home, or trailer, if it is used as a residence.

"Employment purposes", when used in connection with a consumer report, means a report used for the purpose of evaluating a consumer for employment, promotion, reassignment, or retention as an employee.

"File" means all of the information on the consumer that is recorded and retained by a consumer reporting agency regardless of how the information is stored.

"Investigative consumer report" means a consumer report or portion thereof in which information on a consumer's character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living is obtained through personal interviews with neighbors, friends, or associates of the consumer, reported on or with others with whom the consumer is acquainted or who may have knowledge concerning any of the items of information. The term does not include specific factual information on a consumer's credit record obtained directly from a creditor of the consumer or from a consumer reporting agency when the information was obtained directly from a creditor of the consumer or from the consumer.

"Key factors" means all relevant elements or reasons adversely affecting a specific credit score assigned to a consumer, listed in the order of importance, based on the respective effects on the credit score.

"Person" means any natural person, firm, corporation, or partnership.

"Proper identification" means information generally deemed sufficient to identify a person. If the consumer is unable to reasonably identify himself or herself with the information described above, a consumer reporting agency may require additional information concerning the consumer's employment and personal or family history in order to verify his or her identity.

(13.5) "Protected consumer" means a consumer who, at the time a security freeze request is made, is:

Under sixteen years of age; or

Represented by a representative.

(13.7) "Record" means a compilation of information that:

Identifies a protected consumer;

Is created by a consumer reporting agency solely for the purpose of complying with section 5-18-112.5; and

Is not created or used to consider the protected consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or eligibility for other financial services.

(13.9) "Representative" means a:

Parent of an individual who is under sixteen years of age; or

Legal guardian who, pursuant to a testamentary or other trusteeship, power of attorney, or court appointment, is qualified to make decisions regarding the support, care, education, health, or welfare of an individual.

"Reviewing the account" means activities related to account maintenance, monitoring, credit line increases, and account upgrades and enhancements.

"Security freeze" or "freeze" means a notice placed in a consumer report or record, at the request of a consumer or a protected consumer's representative and subject to certain exemptions, that prohibits the consumer reporting agency from releasing the consumer report or record or any information from it without the express authorization of the consumer or of the protected consumer's representative.

"Security freeze" includes a notice:

Placed on a record created under section 5-18-112.5 for a protected consumer for whom the consumer reporting agency does not have a consumer report; and

That prohibits the consumer reporting agency from releasing the protected consumer's record except as provided in section 5-18-112.5.

"Sufficient proof of authority" means documentation demonstrating that a representative has authority to act on behalf of a protected consumer.

"Sufficient proof of authority" includes:

A court order, a copy of a valid power of attorney, a valid trust document, or another legal document that clearly establishes the authority of the representative to act on behalf of the protected consumer; or

In the case of a representative who is a parent of the protected consumer, a certified or official copy of the protected consumer's birth certificate.

"Sufficient proof of identification" means documentation identifying a protected consumer or a representative.

"Sufficient proof of identification" includes a copy of a social security card, a certified or official copy of a birth certificate, a copy of a valid driver's license, or a copy of a government-issued photo identification document.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1114, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(13.5), (13.7), (13.9), (16), and (17) added and (15) amended, (HB 18-1233), ch. 75, p. 650, § 1, effective January 1, 2019.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-102 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-104. Permissible purposes - prohibition.

A consumer reporting agency may furnish a consumer report only under the following circumstances:

In response to an order of a court having jurisdiction to issue such an order;

In accordance with the written instructions of the consumer to whom it relates; and

To a person which the consumer reporting agency has reason to believe:

Intends to use the information in connection with a credit transaction involving the consumer on whom the information is to be furnished and involving an extension of credit to, or review or collection of an account of, the consumer and if the consumer chooses to provide his or her social security number to the user, the user shall include the social security number with, or as a supplement to, a request for a consumer report, and include the social security number when transmitting subsequent credit information to a consumer reporting agency; or

Intends to use the information for employment purposes only if an applicant or employee is first informed that a credit report may be requested in connection with his or her application for employment and the consumer consents in writing to the same; or

Intends to use credit scoring information in connection with the underwriting or rating of insurance involving the consumer and the person establishes that the consumer has received written notification, or notification in the same medium as the application for insurance, that a credit report may be requested in connection with his or her application for insurance, and that credit scoring information may be used to determine either the consumer's eligibility for insurance or the premium to be charged to the consumer; or

Intends to use the information in connection with a determination of the consumer's eligibility for a license or other benefit granted by a governmental instrumentality required by law to consider an applicant's financial responsibility or status; or

Otherwise has a legitimate business need for the information in connection with a business transaction involving the consumer; or

Intends to use the information for any purpose allowed under the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act" and rules promulgated pursuant to that act.

A consumer reporting agency may not, by contract or otherwise, prohibit a user of any consumer report or investigative consumer report from, upon request of the consumer, disclosing and explaining the contents of the report or providing a copy of the report to the consumer to whom it relates if adverse action against the consumer has been taken or is contemplated by the user of the consumer report or investigative consumer report, based in whole or in part on the report. No user or consumer reporting agency shall be held liable or otherwise responsible for a disclosed or copied report when acting pursuant to this subsection (2) nor shall disclosure or provision of a copy of the report, by themselves, make the user a consumer reporting agency.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1116, § 3, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-103 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-105. Consumer reports - accuracy of information.

Whenever a consumer reporting agency prepares a consumer report, including reports that include criminal justice records, the agency shall follow reasonable procedures to assure maximum possible accuracy of the information concerning the consumer about whom the report relates, including the use of the consumer's social security number if, in accordance with section 5-18-104 (1)(c)(I), the consumer's social security number is provided to the consumer reporting agency by a person intending to use the information contained in a consumer report in connection with a credit transaction involving the consumer and the social security number was initially provided to the user by the consumer in connection with that transaction. A consumer reporting agency shall exclude sealed and expunged records from a consumer report, unless the user of the report demonstrates that the user is otherwise required to consider the information pursuant to state or federal statute, rule, or regulation.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1117, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-099), ch. 276, p. 1980, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-103.5 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-106. Disclosures to consumers.

A consumer reporting agency shall, upon written or verbal request and proper identification of any consumer, clearly, accurately, and in a manner that is understandable to the consumer, disclose to the consumer, in writing, all information in its files at the time of the request pertaining to the consumer, including but not limited to:

The names of all persons requesting credit information pertaining to the consumer during the prior twelve-month period and the date of each request;

A set of instructions, presented in a manner that is understandable to the consumer, describing how information is presented on its written disclosure of the file; and

A toll-free number for use in resolving the dispute if the consumer submitted a written dispute to the consumer reporting agency, which operates on a nationwide basis.

A consumer reporting agency shall notify a consumer, by letter sent by first-class mail, that the consumer reporting agency will provide the consumer with a disclosure copy of his or her consumer file at no charge and a toll-free telephone number to call to provide the consumer reporting agency with the information necessary to request a copy, when one of the following events occurs within a twelve-month period:

The consumer reporting agency has received eight credit inquiries pertaining to the consumer; or

The consumer reporting agency has received a report that would add negative information to a consumer's file.

A consumer reporting agency need only send one letter to a consumer per twelve-month period pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section even if more than one event occurs in that period.

Any letter mailed to a consumer pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section shall not contain any identifying information particular to that consumer including, but not limited to, social security number, place of employment, date of birth, or mother's maiden name.

Any letter mailed to a consumer pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section may be a form letter; except that each letter shall advise the consumer of the number and type of events that occurred relating to the consumer that initiated the letter. The letter shall also include a notice or separate form the consumer may complete and return to the consumer reporting agency to request a free copy of the consumer's credit report.

Each consumer reporting agency shall, upon request of a consumer, provide the consumer with one disclosure copy of his or her file per year at no charge whether or not the consumer has made the request in response to the notification required in subsection (2)(a) of this section. If the consumer requests more than one disclosure copy of his or her file per year pursuant to this subsection (2)(e), the consumer reporting agency may charge the consumer up to eight dollars for each additional disclosure copy.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1117, § 3, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-104 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-107. Credit scoring related to the extension of credit secured by a dwelling - definition.

In connection with an application for an extension of credit for a consumer purpose that is to be secured by a dwelling, the consumer reporting agency shall, upon the written request of the consumer, contained either in the application for an extension of credit or in a separate document, disclose to the consumer the following:

The consumer's current credit score or the most recent credit score of the consumer that was previously calculated by the consumer reporting agency;

The range of possible credit scores under the model used;

The key factors, if any, not to exceed four, that adversely affected the credit score of the consumer in the model used;

The date on which the credit score was created; and

The name of the person or entity that provided the credit score or the credit file on the basis of which the credit score was created.

Nothing in subsection (1) of this section shall be construed to compel a consumer reporting agency to develop or disclose a credit score if the agency does not:

Distribute scores that are used in connection with extensions of credit secured by residential real estate; or

Develop credit scores that assist creditors in understanding the general credit behavior of the consumer and predicting future credit behavior.

Nothing in subsection (1) of this section shall be construed to require a consumer reporting agency that distributes credit scores developed by another person or entity to provide further explanation of those scores or to process a dispute that may arise about information; except that the consumer reporting agency shall be required to provide to the consumer the name of, and current contact information for, the person or entity that developed the score or developed the methodology for the score.

Nothing in subsection (1) of this section shall be construed to require a consumer reporting agency to maintain credit scores in its files.

Nothing in subsection (3) of this section shall be construed to compel disclosures of a credit score except upon specific request of a consumer. If a consumer requests a credit file and not the credit score, then the consumer shall be provided with the credit file together with a statement that the consumer may request and obtain a credit score.

Pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, a consumer reporting agency shall supply to a consumer:

A credit score that is derived from a credit scoring model that is widely distributed to users of credit scores by that consumer reporting agency in connection with any extension of credit secured by a dwelling; or

A credit score accompanied by information specifically required to be disclosed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section that assists the consumer in understanding the credit scoring assessment of the credit behavior of the consumer and predictions about future credit behavior.

For purposes of this section, "credit score" means a numerical value or a categorization derived from a statistical tool or modeling system used by a person who makes or arranges a loan to predict the likelihood of certain credit behaviors, including default. The numerical value or the categorization derived from this analysis may also be referred to as a "risk predictor" or "risk score". "Credit score" does not include any mortgage score or rating of an automated underwriting system that considers one or more factors in addition to credit information, including, but not limited to, the loan value ratio, the amount of down payment, or a consumer's financial assets. "Credit score" does not include other elements of the underwriting process or underwriting decision.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article 18 to the contrary, a consumer reporting agency may charge a reasonable fee for disclosing a credit score.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1118, § 3, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-104.3 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-108. Charges for certain disclosures.

A consumer reporting agency shall not impose a charge for:

A request for a copy of the consumer's file made within sixty days after adverse action is taken; or

Notifying any person designated by the consumer, pursuant to the applicable provisions of the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681i, as amended, of the deletion of information that is found to be inaccurate or that can no longer be verified; or

A set of instructions for understanding the information presented on the consumer report and a toll free telephone number that consumers may utilize to obtain additional assistance concerning the consumer report; or

The first copy of a consumer disclosure provided to a consumer each calendar year pursuant to section 5-18-106 (2)(a).

For all other disclosures to consumers of information pertaining to the consumer, the consumer reporting agency may impose a reasonable charge, not to exceed the retail price of a written report rendered in the normal course of business to the customers of the agency for each request for information.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1120, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(1)(d) amended, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2794, § 1, effective July 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-105 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-109. Reporting of information prohibited - exceptions.

Except as authorized under subsection (2) of this section, no consumer reporting agency shall make any consumer report containing any of the following items of information:

Cases under title 11 of the United States Code, or under the federal bankruptcy act that, from the date of entry of the order for relief or the date of adjudication, predate the report by more than ten years;

Suits and judgments that, from the date of entry, predate the report by more than seven years or by more than the governing statute of limitations, whichever is the longer period;

Paid tax liens that, from the date of payment, predate the report by more than seven years;

Accounts placed for collection or charged to profit and loss that predate the report by more than seven years;

Records of arrest, indictment, or conviction of a crime that, from the date of disposition, release, or parole, predate the report by more than seven years;

Sealed records, expunged records, and records that did not result in a conviction;

Any other adverse item of information that predates the report by more than seven years.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section do not apply to the case of any consumer report to be used in connection with:

A credit transaction involving, or that may reasonably be expected to involve, a principal amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more; or

The underwriting of life insurance involving, or that may reasonably be expected to involve, a face amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

A consumer reporting agency shall not furnish for employment purposes, or in connection with a credit or insurance transaction or a direct marketing transaction, a consumer report that contains medical information about a consumer unless the consumer consents to the furnishing of the report.

A consumer reporting agency shall not include, in a consumer report made to a person requesting credit information pertaining to a consumer, the names of any other persons who have requested credit information pertaining to that consumer or the number of such inquiries made more than one year preceding the date of the consumer report; except that such information shall be retained for two years and provided to the consumer as provided in this article 18.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (4) of this section, a consumer reporting agency shall not furnish to any person, including a developer of credit scoring, a record of inquiries in connection with a credit or insurance transaction that is not initiated by the consumer. The term "credit or insurance transaction that is not initiated by the consumer" does not include inquiries resulting from the collection of an account or for purposes of reviewing an account.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1120, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2022:

(1)(e.5) added and (2) amended, (SB 22-099), ch. 276, p. 1980, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-105.3 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-110. Procedure for disputed information.

If the completeness or accuracy of any item of information contained in the consumer's file is disputed by the consumer and the consumer notifies the consumer reporting agency directly of the dispute, the agency shall reinvestigate the item free of charge and record the current status of the disputed information on or before thirty business days after the date the agency receives notice conveyed by the consumer. The consumer reporting agency shall provide the consumer with the option of speaking directly to a representative of the agency to notify the agency of disputed information contained in the consumer's file.

On or before five business days after the date a consumer reporting agency receives notice of a dispute from a consumer in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, the agency shall provide notice of the dispute to all persons who provided any item of information in dispute.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a consumer reporting agency may terminate a reinvestigation of information disputed by a consumer under subsection (1) if the agency reasonably determines that the consumer's dispute is frivolous or irrelevant. Upon making such a determination, a consumer reporting agency shall promptly notify the consumer of its determination and reasons, by mail, or if authorized by the consumer for that purpose, by telephone. The presence of contradictory information in the consumer's file does not in and of itself constitute reasonable grounds for determining the dispute is frivolous or irrelevant.

If, after a reinvestigation under subsection (1) of this section of any information disputed by a consumer, the information is inaccurate or cannot be verified, the consumer reporting agency shall promptly delete the information from the consumer's file, revise the file, provide the consumer and, at the request of the consumer, any person that, within the last twelve months, requested the disputed information with a revised consumer report indicating that it is a revised consumer report, and refrain from reporting the information in subsequent reports. The consumer reporting agency shall advise the consumer that he or she has the right to have a copy of the revised consumer report sent by the consumer reporting agency to any person that requested the disputed information within the last twelve months.

Information deleted pursuant to subsection (4) of this section may not be reinserted in the consumer's file unless the person who furnishes the information reinvestigates and states in writing or by electronic record to the consumer reporting agency that the information is complete and accurate.

A consumer reporting agency shall provide written notice of the results of any reinvestigation or reinsertion made pursuant to this section within five business days of the completion of the reinvestigation or reinsertion. The notice shall include:

A statement that the reinvestigation is complete;

A statement of the determination of the consumer reporting agency on the completeness or accuracy of the disputed information;

A copy of the consumer's file or consumer report and a description of the results of the reinvestigation;

A notice that, if requested by the consumer, a description of the procedure used to determine the accuracy and completeness of the information shall be provided to the consumer by the consumer reporting agency, including the name, business address, and, if available, the telephone number of any person contacted in connection with that information;

A notification that the consumer has the right, pursuant to the applicable provisions of the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681i, as amended, to add a statement to the consumer's file disputing the accuracy or completeness of the information; and

A notification of the consumer's rights to dispute resolution under section 5-18-116, which are available after the consumer has followed all dispute procedures described in this section and has received the notice specified under this subsection (6).

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a person who obtains a consumer report for resale to alter or correct any inaccuracy in the consumer report if the consumer report was not assembled or prepared by the person.

The consumer reporting agency shall provide a person who provides credit information to the agency with the option to speak directly with a representative of the agency or to submit corrections to previously reported information by facsimile or other automated means when inaccurate information that was reported by the credit information provider appears on a consumer's file. The consumer reporting agency shall, in a period not to exceed five business days from the receipt of the faxed or automated information regarding the corrections, correct the inaccuracies on the consumer's file and, upon request, communicate the corrections to the person who submitted the initial request for corrections. The credit information provider's communication shall include information established by the consumer reporting agency that identifies him or her as the credit information provider who provided the original inaccurate information. Nothing in this subsection (8) shall be construed to prohibit a consumer reporting agency from correcting inaccurate information in a consumer's file or a consumer report at any time.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1121, § 3, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-106 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-18-111. Consumer report information block.

A consumer reporting agency shall, within thirty days after the receipt of a police report or order pursuant to this subsection (1)(a), permanently block the reporting of any information that a consumer identifies on his or her consumer report as being subject to either a police report or a court order referenced in subsection (1)(a)(I) or (1)(a)(II) of this section if the consumer provides a consumer reporting agency with proof of the consumer's identification and a copy of:

A police report that alleges that a person other than the consumer obtained or recorded, by means of fraud, theft, or other violation of the "Colorado Criminal Code", personal identifying information of the consumer without authorization from the consumer and that the person used the information to obtain, or attempt to obtain, credit, goods, services, or money in the name of the consumer without the consumer's consent; or

A certified court order issued pursuant to section 18-1.3-603 (7).

The consumer reporting agency shall promptly notify the person who furnished the information that a police report or court order has been filed, that a block has been requested, and the effective date of the block.

A consumer reporting agency may decline to block or may rescind any block of consumer information if, in the exercise of good faith and reasonable judgment, the consumer reporting agency believes:

The information was blocked due to a misrepresentation of fact by the consumer relevant to the request to block under this section;

The consumer agrees that the blocked information or portions of the blocked information were blocked in error;

The consumer knowingly obtained possession of goods, services, or money as a result of the blocked transaction or transactions or the consumer should have known that he or she obtained possession of goods, services, or money as a result of the blocked transaction or transactions; or

The consumer so requests in writing and presents proof of the consumer's identity.

A consumer reporting agency shall decline to block or shall rescind any block of consumer information if, in the case of a block or block request based upon the filing of an order, the sentencing court amends, dismisses, or withdraws its prior order to correct records issued pursuant to section 18-1.3-603 (7), and the consumer provides documentation from the court and proof of the consumer's identity.

If a block of credit information is declined or rescinded pursuant to this section, the consumer reporting agency shall promptly notify the consumer in the same manner as consumers are notified of the reinsertion of information pursuant to section 5-18-110. The prior presence of the blocked information in the consumer reporting agency's file on the consumer is not evidence of whether the consumer knew or should have known that he or she obtained possession of any goods, services, or money.

This section does not apply to a consumer reporting agency that acts as a reseller of information by assembling and merging information contained in the data base of one or more other consumer reporting agencies and that does not maintain a data base of the assembled or merged information from which new consumer reports are produced.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1123, § 3, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.3-106.5 as it existed prior to 2017.